Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2497
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Prescription Drug Donation Program Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(2) Health care facility has the definition found in section 71-413 and includes the office of an individual licensed to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery;

(3) Pharmacy has the definition found in section 71-425;

(4) Prescribing practitioner means a health care practitioner licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act who is authorized to prescribe drugs;

(5) Prescription drug has the definition found in section 38-2841 excluding controlled substances as defined in section 28-401 and any drugs subject to the requirements of 21 U.S.C. 355-1(f)(3); and

(6) Program means the Prescription Drug Donation Program approved pursuant to section 71-2498.

Laws 2024, LB1035, § 2.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.